Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.74, is amended to read: 609.74 PUBLIC NUISANCE. new text begin (a) new text end Whoever by an act or failure to perform a legal duty intentionally does any of the following is guilty of maintaining a public nuisance, which is a misdemeanor: (1) maintains or permits a condition which unreasonably annoys, injures or endangers the safety, health, morals, comfort, or repose of any considerable number of members of the public; or (2) new text begin except as provided in paragraph (b), new text end interferes with, obstructs, or renders dangerous for passage, any public highway or right-of-way, or waters used by the public; or (3) is guilty of any other act or omission declared by law to be a public nuisance and for which no sentence is specifically provided. new text begin (b) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to interfere with or obstruct traffic that is entering, exiting, or on a freeway or entering, exiting, or on a public roadway within the boundaries of airport property with the intent to interfere with, obstruct, or otherwise disrupt traffic. This paragraph does not apply to the actions of law enforcement or other emergency responders, road or airport authorities, or utility officials, or their agents, employees, or contractors when carrying out duties imposed by law or contract. For purposes of this paragraph: (1) "airport" means an airport that has a control tower and airline service; and (2) "freeway" means any section of a divided highway where the only access and egress for vehicular traffic is from entrance and exit ramps. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end